puflantu.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
    <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
    <sdefs>
        <sdef n="n"/>
        <sdef n="sg"/>
        <sdef n="dl"/>
        <sdef n="pl"/>
    </sdefs>
    <pardefs>
        <pardef n="torel/i_n">
            <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
            <e><p><l>w</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="dl"/></r></p></e>
            <e><p><l>we</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        </pardef>
    </pardefs>
    <section id="main" type="standard">
        <e lm="torel"><i>torel</i><par n="torel/i_n"/></e>
    </section>
</dictionary>
